Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. Conduct of Election; Election Results.
§ 24.2-649.
Assistance for certain voters inside the polling place; penalties.

Any qualified voter who requires assistance to vote by reason of physical disability or inability to read or write may, if he so requests, be assisted in voting. If he is blind, he may designate an officer of election or any other person to assist him. If he is unable to read and write or disabled for any cause other than blindness, he may designate an officer of election or some other person to assist him other than the voter’s employer or agent of that employer, or officer or agent of the voter’s union.The officer of election or other person so designated shall not enter the booth with the voter unless (i) the voter signs a request stating that he requires assistance by reason of physical disability or inability to read or write and (ii) the officer of election or other person signs a statement that he is not the voter’s employer or an agent of that employer, or an officer or agent of the voter’s union, and that he will act in accordance with the requirements of this section. The request and statement shall be on a single form furnished by the State Board. If the voter is unable to sign the request, his own mark acknowledged by him before an officer of election shall be sufficient signature, provided no mark shall be required of a voter who is blind. An officer of election shall advise the voter and person assisting the voter of the requirements of this section and record the name of the voter and the name and address of the person assisting him.The officer of election or other person so designated shall assist the qualified voter in the preparation of his ballot in accordance with his instructions and without soliciting his vote or in any manner attempting to influence his vote and shall not in any manner divulge or indicate, by signs or otherwise, how the voter voted on any office or question. If a printed ballot is used, the officer or other person so designated shall deposit the ballot in the ballot container in accordance with §

24.2-646

or in the ballot scanner machine in accordance with the instructions of the State Board.

If the voter requires assistance in a language other than English and has not designated a person to assist him, an officer of election may assist as an interpreter, but shall first inquire of the representatives authorized to be present pursuant to §

24.2-604.4

whether they have a volunteer available who can interpret for the voter. One representative interpreter for each party or candidate, insofar as available, shall be permitted to observe the officer of election communicate with the voter. In any locality designated as a covered locality pursuant to §

24.2-128

, the local electoral board shall ensure that interpretation services in the language of the applicable minority group are available and easily accessible to voters needing assistance pursuant to this subsection. The voter may designate one of the volunteer party or candidate interpreters to provide assistance. A person so designated by the voter shall meet all the requirements of this section for a person providing assistance.

A person who willfully violates subsection A or B is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. In addition, the provisions of §

24.2-1016

and its felony penalties for false statements shall be applicable to any request or statement signed pursuant to this section, and the provisions of §§

24.2-704

and

24.2-1012

and the felony penalties for violations of the law related to providing assistance to absentee voters shall be applicable in such cases.

In any precinct in which an electronic voting machine is available that provides an audio ballot, the officers of election shall notify a voter requiring assistance pursuant to this section that such machine is available for him to use to vote in privacy without assistance and the officers of election shall instruct the voter on the use of the voting machine. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a voter to use the machine unassisted.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-245, 24-251, 24-252, 24-310; 1950, c. 230; 1952, c. 581; 1962, c. 536; 1964, c. 593; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 5; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-129, 24.1-132, 24.1-220; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1984, cc. 234, 775; 1985, cc. 197, 458; 1986, c. 558; 1987, c. 349; 1988, c. 598; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 993, 1010; 2005, c. 569; 2006, c. 242; 2009, c. 809; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2020, c. 561; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 163, 528, 533.

Cross references.

As to assistance for preparation of application for absentee ballot, see §

24.2-701

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “container” for “box” in subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and rewrote subsection A and added the last paragraph in subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 569 substituted “provided no mark shall be required of a voter who is blind” for “If the voter being assisted is blind, neither the request nor the statement shall be required to be signed and” in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 242 added the language beginning “and the provisions of §§

24.2-704

and

24.2-1012

” at the end of the fourth paragraph in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 809, in subsection B, in the third paragraph, added the present last sentence; added present subsection C; redesignated former subsection C as present subsection D; and in subsection D, in the first paragraph, substituted “subsection B or C” for “this subsection.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and substituted “printed” for “paper ballot or a mark sense” and “paper” throughout the section; in subsection A substituted “obscuring his vote” for “fold and,” “a paper” for “the,” “or a machine-readable ballot in the ballot scanner machine” for “The voter shall mark the mark sense ballot in the officer’s presence but in a secret manner and cover and return the ballot to the officer who shall immediately return to the polling place and deposit the ballot in the ballot counter,” and inserted “shall” preceding “deposit”; in the second paragraph of subsection A and subsection E substituted “machine” for “device” throughout and a variation of “machine” for “equipment”; in the last paragraph of subsection B inserted “or in the ballot scanner machine in accordance with the instructions of the State Board”; in subsection D substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty”; and designated the last paragraph as subsection E and substituted “section” for “subsection” twice.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 561 substituted “§

24.2-604.4

” for “§

24.2-604

” in subsection C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 163, effective July 1, 2021, transferred to §

24.2-649.1

and rewrote former subsection A; redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and updated references in subsection C.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “may assist as an interpreter, but shall first” for “before he assists an interpreter, shall” in the first sentence, and inserted the third sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 53, 56.

§ 24.2-649.1.
Assistance for certain voters outside of the polling place.

Any voter with a disability or who is age 65 or older shall be entitled to vote outside of the polling place in accordance with the provisions of this section. However, during a declared state of emergency related to a communicable disease of public health threat, any voter, regardless of age or disability, shall be entitled to vote outside of the polling place in accordance with the provisions of this section. For purposes of this section, a disability shall include a permanent physical disability, a temporary physical disability, or an injury.

The area designated for voting outside of the polling place shall be within 150 feet of the entrance to the polling place. This area shall be clearly marked, and instructions on how to notify an officer of election of the voter’s request to vote outside of the polling place shall be prominently displayed. The Department shall prescribe the form and content of such instructions, but in no case shall the voter be required to enter the polling place to provide such notice.

A voter eligible pursuant to subsection A shall be handed a printed ballot by an officer of election. He shall mark the ballot in the officer’s presence but in a secret manner and, obscuring his vote, shall return the ballot to the officer. The officer shall immediately return to the polling place and shall deposit a paper ballot in the ballot container in accordance with §

24.2-646

or a machine-readable ballot in the ballot scanner machine in accordance with the instructions of the State Board.

Any county or city that has acquired an electronic voting machine that is so constructed as to be easily portable may use the voting machine in lieu of a printed ballot for voting outside of the polling place, so long as: (i) the voting machine remains in the plain view of two officers of election representing two political parties, or in a primary election, two officers of election representing the party conducting the primary, provided that if the use of two officers for this purpose would result in too few officers remaining in the polling place to meet legal requirements, the voting machine shall remain in plain view of one officer who shall be either the chief officer or the assistant chief officer and (ii) the voter casts his ballot in a secret manner unless the voter requests assistance pursuant to §

24.2-649

.After the voter has completed voting his ballot, the officer or officers shall immediately return the voting machine to its assigned location inside the polling place, and shall record (a) the machine number, (b) the time that the machine was removed and the time that it was returned, (c) the number on the machine’s public counter before the machine was removed and the number on the same counter when it was returned, and (d) the name or names of the officer or officers who accompanied the machine on the statement of results. The names of the voters who used the machine while it was removed shall also be recorded provided that secrecy of the ballot is maintained in accordance with guidance from the State Board. If a polling place fails to record the information required in clause (a), (b), (c), or (d), or it is later proven that the information recorded was intentionally falsified, the local electoral board or general registrar shall dismiss at a minimum the chief officer or the assistant chief officer, or both, as appropriate, and shall dismiss any other officer of election who is shown to have caused the failure to record the required information intentionally or by gross negligence or to have intentionally falsified the information. The dismissed officers shall not be allowed thereafter to serve as an officer or other election official anywhere in the Commonwealth.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 163.

Editor’s note.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 24.2-650.
Officers to sign only official papers, etc.

No officer of election shall sign or otherwise mark any paper, form, or item, other than one furnished by the State Board, his electoral board, or general registrar, at his polling place during the hours that the polls are open.

History.

1976, c. 616, § 24.1-132.1; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-651.
Voter who is challenged; how challenge tried.

Any qualified voter may, and the officers of election shall, challenge the vote of any person who is listed on the pollbook but is known or suspected not to be a qualified voter.

The individual making the challenge shall complete and sign the following statement on a form provided by the State Board:

“I do hereby state, subject to penalties for hindering, intimidating, or interfering with a qualified voter pursuant to , that I am a qualified voter of this Commonwealth or an officer of election and that, to the best of my knowledge, information, and belief, is not a qualified voter of this precinct by reason of (please check each of the following reasons that is applicable): §

24.2-607

1. The named person is not a citizen of the United States; 2. The named person is not now 18 years of age or, in the case of a primary election or a special election held on a date other that a general election date, will not reach the age of 18 before the next general election; 3. The named person is not a resident of the Commonwealth (or, if he has not been a resident of the Commonwealth within the preceding 30 days, he is attempting to vote for an office or issue other than electors of President and Vice President of the United States); 4. The named person is not a resident of this precinct (or he has not been a resident of this precinct since the second preceding general federal election and has not continued to be a resident of this county or city and this congressional district); 5. The named person is not a resident of the town in the case of a town election; 6. The named person has been disqualified from voting by the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth and this disqualification has not been removed by proper authority; 7. The named person is not the identical person he represents himself to be; or 8. The named person has voted in this election at this or another voting place (state when and where the named person previously voted in this election: ).” Upon receipt of a signed challenge from a qualified voter or officer of election, an officer of election shall explain to the challenged voter the qualifications of a voter and may examine him concerning his qualifications. The officers of election are hereby authorized to administer the necessary oath or affirmation to any witness brought before them to testify as to the qualifications of any person offering to vote. If the person being challenged insists that he is qualified and the challenge is not withdrawn, one of the officers shall give him a form containing the following statement: “I do hereby state, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to , that I am a citizen of the United States, that I am at least 18 years of age (or will be on the day of , ) that I am a resident of the Commonwealth of Virginia (or that I have been a resident of this Commonwealth within the preceding 30 days and am voting only for electors of President and Vice President of the United States), and that, according to the best of my knowledge, information and belief, I am not disqualified from voting by the Constitution and laws of this Commonwealth; that my full name is ; that in such name I was duly registered as a voter of this precinct; that I am now or at some time since the last November general election have been an actual resident of this precinct or that I have been an actual resident of this precinct at some time since the second preceding general federal election and have been and continue to be a resident of this county or city and this congressional district; if I am voting in a town election today, that I am currently a resident of that town; that I am the identical person I represent myself to be; and that I have not voted in this election at this or any voting place and will not vote in this election at any other voting place.” §

24.2-1016

Click to view

If the person challenged refuses to sign the statement, he shall not be permitted to vote. If, however, he signs the statement, he shall be permitted to vote on the voting system in use at the precinct, unless he is required to cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-651.1

.

When the voter has signed the statement and is permitted to vote, the officers of election shall mark his name on the pollbook with the first or next consecutive number from the voter count form, or shall enter that the voter has voted if the pollbook is in electronic form, and shall indicate on the pollbook that he has signed the required statement in accordance with the instructions of the State Board.

If the envelope containing a voted absentee ballot has been properly signed by the voter, such ballot shall not be subject to challenge pursuant to this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-253, 24-254, 24-325; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-133; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 265; 1972, c. 620; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 346; 2003, c. 1015; 2007, c. 375; 2012, cc. 838, 839.

Editor’s note.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2012, c. 839, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated August 20, 2012. Acts 2012, c. 838 was deemed superseded by Acts 2012, c. 839 and was not submitted for preclearance.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “pollbook” for “precinct registered voter list” in the first paragraph, in the fourth paragraph, substituted “18” for “eighteen,” and “30” for “thirty,” and rewrote the next-to-last paragraph, which formerly read: “When the voter has signed the statement and is permitted to vote, the officers of election shall indicate on the pollbook, after the name of such person, that he has signed the required statement.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 375 added the present second paragraph, third paragraph and subdivisions 1 through 8; rewrote the fourth paragraph; inserted “if I am voting in a town election today, that I am currently a resident of that town”; in the sixth paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 838 and 839 are identical, and added “unless he is required to cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-651.1

” at the end of the fifth paragraph following paragraph 8.

§ 24.2-651.1.
Voter who is shown as having already voted; provisional ballots.

Any person who offers to vote, who is listed on the pollbook, and whose name is marked to indicate that he has already voted in person in the election shall cast a provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653

. The State Board of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots.

History.

1997, c. 915; 2000, cc. 366, 451; 2003, c. 1015; 2012, cc. 723, 838, 839; 2020, c. 735.

Editor’s note.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2012, c. 723, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated June 21, 2012.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2012, c. 839, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated August 20, 2012. Acts 2012, c. 838 was deemed superseded by Acts 2012, c. 839 and was not submitted for preclearance.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 366 and 451 are identical, and substituted “his valid Virginia driver’s license, or any other identification card issued by a government agency of the Commonwealth, one of its political subdivisions, or the United States; or any valid employee identification card containing a photograph of the voter and issued by an employer of the voter in the ordinary course of the employer’s business” for “any preprinted form of identification which shows his name and address, any preprinted form of identification which shows his name and signature, or any preprinted form of identification which shows his name and photograph” in the second paragraph..

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “pollbook” for “precinct registered voter list” in the first and third paragraphs, and rewrote the last paragraph, which formerly read: “When the voter has shown the requested identification, has signed the statement, and is permitted to vote, the officers of election shall mark the precinct registered voter lists and shall indicate that the person has signed the required statement in accordance with the instructions of the State Board of Elections.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 723 inserted “, his concealed handgun permit issued pursuant to §

18.2-308

,” in the second sentence of the second paragraph. The amendment was not implemented as the paragraph was deleted by Acts 2012, cc. 838 and 839.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 838 and 839 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 735 substituted “pursuant to” for “as provided in” in the first sentence.

§ 24.2-652.
Voter whose name erroneously omitted from pollbook; provisional ballots.

When a person offers to vote and his name does not appear on the pollbook, the officers of election shall permit him to vote only if all of the following conditions are met:

An officer of election is informed by the general registrar that the voter is registered to vote, that his registration has not been cancelled, and that his name is erroneously omitted from the pollbook.

The voter signs a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is a qualified and registered voter of that precinct, a resident of that precinct, and his registration is not subject to cancellation pursuant to §§

24.2-430

,

24.2-431

, and

24.2-432

; and he provides, subject to such penalties, all the information required to identify himself including the last four digits of his social security number, if any, full name including the maiden or any other prior legal name, birthdate, and complete address.

The officer of election enters the identifying information for the voter on the pollbook.When the voter has signed the statement and is permitted to vote, the officers of election shall mark his name on the pollbook with the next consecutive number from the voter count form, or shall enter that the voter has voted if the pollbook is in electronic form, and shall indicate on the pollbook that he has signed the required statement in accordance with the instructions of the State Board.

If the general registrar is not available or cannot state that the person is registered to vote, such person shall be allowed to vote by provisional ballot pursuant to §

24.2-653

. The officers of election shall provide to him an application for registration. The State Board of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-95; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-55; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1981, c. 425; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2011, c. 602; 2020, c. 735.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “pollbook” for “precinct registered voter list” throughout the section; and rewrote the last paragraph, which formerly read: “When the voter has signed the statement and is permitted to vote, the officers of election shall indicate on the pollbook, after the name of such person, that he has signed the required statement.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 602 substituted “including the last four digits of his social security number” for “including social security number, if any” in subdivision 2.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 735 added subsection B and designated the preceding paragraphs as subsection A.

§ 24.2-653.
Provisional voting; procedures in polling place.

Any person voting provisionally pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-643

, §

24.2-651.1

, subsection B of §

24.2-652

, or § 24.2- 653.1 or

24.2-653.2

shall be given a printed ballot and provide, subject to the penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, on a green envelope supplied by the Department of Elections, the identifying information required on the envelope, including the last four digits of his social security number, if any, full name including the maiden or any other prior legal name, date of birth, complete address, and signature. Such person shall be asked to present one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

. If he is unable to present one of these forms of identification, he shall sign a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be. The officers of election shall note on the green envelope whether or not the voter has presented one of the specified forms of identification or signed the required statement in lieu of presenting one of the specified forms of identification. The officers of election shall enter the appropriate information for the person in the precinct provisional ballots log in accordance with the instructions of the State Board but shall not enter a consecutive number for the voter on the pollbook nor otherwise mark his name as having voted.The voter shall then, in the presence of an officer of election, but in a secret manner, mark the printed ballot as provided in §

24.2-644

and seal it in the green envelope. The envelope containing the ballot shall then promptly be placed in the ballot container by an officer of election.

An officer of election, by a written notice given to the voter, shall inform him that a determination of his right to vote shall be made by the electoral board and advise the voter of the beginning time and place for the board’s meeting and of the voter’s right to be present at that meeting. If the voter is voting provisionally as required by §

24.2-643

, an officer of election, by written notice given to the voter, shall also inform him that he may submit a copy of one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

or a statement, signed by him subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be to the electoral board by facsimile, electronic mail, in-person submission, or timely United States Postal Service or commercial mail delivery, to be received by the electoral board no later than noon on the third day after the election.

The provisional votes submitted pursuant to subsection A, in their unopened envelopes, shall be sealed in a special envelope marked “Provisional Votes,” inscribed with the number of envelopes contained therein, and signed by the officers of election who counted them. All provisional votes envelopes shall be delivered either (i) to the clerk of the circuit court who shall deliver all such envelopes to the secretary of the electoral board or (ii) to the general registrar in localities in which the electoral board has directed delivery of election materials to the general registrar pursuant to §

24.2-668

.

History.

1975, c. 515, §§ 24.1-55.1, 24.1-55.2; 1982, c. 650; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 8; 1997, cc. 438, 456; 2002, c. 24; 2003, cc. 984, 1015; 2004, c. 410; 2005, c. 824; 2007, c. 692; 2008, cc. 110, 559; 2010, c. 448; 2012, cc. 592, 838, 839; 2013, c. 503; 2014, cc. 486, 540, 576; 2015, cc. 133, 712; 2020, cc. 735, 1064, 1065.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

The amendment to this section by Acts 2012, c. 592, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated June 22, 2012.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2012, c. 839, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to
§ 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated August 20, 2012. Acts 2012, c. 838 was deemed superseded by Acts 2012, c. 839 and was not submitted for preclearance.

Acts 2020, c. 735 amended this section and recodified portions of the text as new §

24.2-653.01

. Some of the amendments by Acts 2020, cc. 908, 909, 920, 1064 and 1065 have been given effect in §

24.2-653.01

at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2020, cc. 1064 and 1065, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 24, in subsection B, in the first paragraph, substituted “conditional votes submitted” for “votes cast” near the beginning of the first sentence, in the first sentence of the second paragraph, substituted “having submitted such a conditional vote” for “having cast such a ballot” and added “as a qualified voter in the precinct in which he offered the conditional vote,” and in the third paragraph, inserted “as a qualified voter in the precinct in which he offered the conditional vote” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 984 inserted the second and third sentences in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “pollbook” for “precinct registered voter list” throughout the section; in subsection A, rewrote the last sentence of the second paragraph, which formerly read: “The officers of election shall enter the appropriate information for the person on the precinct registered voter list but not mark his name as having voted nor enter it on the precinct pollbook, ” substituted “container” for “box” in the third paragraph, and inserted “and of the voter’s right to be present at that meeting” at the end of the last paragraph; in subsection B, rewrote the second paragraph, which formerly read: “The electoral board shall meet on the day following the election and determine whether each person having submitted such a conditional vote was entitled to do so as a qualified voter in the precinct in which he offered the conditional vote. One authorized representative of each political party or independent candidate in a general election or one authorized representative of each candidate in a primary or special election, who is a qualified voter of the city or county, shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the determination is being made so long as he does not impede the orderly conduct of the determination,” and in the fourth paragraph, deleted “the precinct registered voter list shall be so marked” following “entitled to vote,” inserted “and marked as having voted” following “pollbook,” and substituted “container” for “box.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, substituted “provisional” for “conditional” throughout the section; substituted “Provisional” for “Conditional” in the first sentence of the first paragraph in subsection B; and added subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 824, in the last paragraph of subsection A, inserted “by a written notice given to the voter,” substituted “him” for “the voter,” and added the next-to-last and last sentences; and added the last sentence in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 692 added the last sentence to the second paragraph in subsection A; and added the provisions of (ii) to the end of the second sentence of the fourth paragraph in subsection B and made related changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 110 and 559 are identical, and in the fourth sentence of the second paragraph in subsection A, substituted “in the precinct provisional ballots log” for “on the pollbook” and inserted “on the pollbook” following “for the voter.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 448, in subsection B, in the third paragraph, deleted “who is a qualified voter of the city or county” following “in a primary election” and substituted “any jurisdiction of the Commonwealth” for “the county or city.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 592, in subsection B, substituted “is being made as an observer so long as he does not participate in the proceedings and does not impede” for “is being made so long as he does not impede” in the first sentence of the third paragraph, added the fourth paragraph, substituted clause (a) and (b) designators for the former clause (i) and (ii) designators in the second sentence of the present fifth paragraph; and deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” in the third sentence of subsection C.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 838 and 839, are nearly identical, and in subsection A, added the second sentence of the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, substituted “required on the envelope, including his social security number, if any, full name including the maiden or any other prior legal name, date of birth, complete address, and signature” for “required in §

24.2-652

” in the first sentence,
and rewrote the third sentence, which formerly read: “If he is unable to present one of these forms of identification, he shall sign a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter who he claims to be, and the officers of election shall note on the green envelope that the required statement was signed in lieu of presenting one of the specified forms of identification”; and in the final paragraph, inserted the clause (i) and (ii) designators and clause (iii), and deleted “on the following day and” at the end of clause (i), and made related changes; and in the fourth paragraph of subsection B, inserted “or has not been provided one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

,” in the first sentence,
added “or whose provisional vote was not counted” at the end of the last sentence, and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 503 inserted “promptly” in the second sentence of the third paragraph in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 486 deleted “to the following day” following “provisional vote” in the last paragraph of subsection A; and deleted “to the following day” following “ballot an extension” and “from day to day” following “adjourned” in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in the first and second paragraphs of subsection A, substituted “printed” for “paper”; in the second paragraph of subsection A inserted “the last four digits of”; and in the third paragraph of subsection A inserted “printed.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 133 added the fourth and fifth sentences in the third paragraph of subsection B.

The 2015 amendment by c. 712 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A and in the second sentence of the fifth paragraph of subsection B; added the last sentence of the seventh paragraph of subsection B; and substituted “Department” for “State Board” in the last sentence of subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 735, in subsection A, deleted the first two sentences, which read, “When a person offers to vote pursuant to §

24.2-652

and the general registrar is not available or cannot state that the person is registered to vote, then such person shall be allowed to vote by printed ballot in the manner provided in this section. This procedure shall also apply when required by §

24.2-643

or

24.2-651.1

” and substituted “Any person voting provisionally pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-643

, §

24.2-651.1

, subsection B of §

24.2-652

, or §

24.2-653.1

or

24.2-653.2

” for “Such” and deleted the former last sentence; redesignated the last paragraph of subsection A as subsection B; in current subsection B, deleted “(i)” following “voter, shall” and “(ii)” following “electoral board” in the first sentence, substituted “meeting. If the voter is voting provisionally as required by § 24.2-643, an officer of election, by written notice given to the voter, shall also inform him” for “meeting, and (iii) inform a voter voting provisionally when required by § 24.2-643” in the current first and second sentences and deleted the former last two sentences; redesignated the first paragraph of former subsection B as subsection C and deleted the remainder of the section, transferring much of it to new §

24.2-653.01

.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1064 and 1065 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted the third sentence and inserted “or signed the required statement in lieu of presenting one of the specified forms of identification” in the fourth sentence; in subsection B, inserted “or a statement, signed by him subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be.”

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).